hr-HR: Vrsta HVAC upravljačkog uređaja: Digitalna; Ručno; Programabilna; Pametna; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип управление на ОВК: Цифров; Ръчен; Програмируем; Смарт; Други
ko: HVAC 제어 유형: 디지털; 수동; 프로그래밍 가능; 스마트; 기타
de: Steuerungsart der Klimaanlage: Digital; Manuell; Programmierbar; Smart; Sonstiges
nb: VVS-kontrolltype: Digital; Manuell; Programmerbar; Smart; Annet
vi: Loại điều khiển điều hoà không khí: Kỹ thuật số; Xe lăn thủ công; Có thể lập trình; Thông minh; Khác
fi: LVI-ohjaustyyppi: Digitaalinen; Manuaalinen; Ohjelmoitava; Älykäs; Muu
sk-SK: Typ riadenia vykurovania, vetrania a klimatizácie: Digitálny; Manuálny; Programovateľný; Inteligentný; Iné
fr: Type de contrôle HVAC: Numérique; Manuel; Programmable; Intelligent; Autre
en: HVAC control type: Digital; Manual; Programmable; Smart; Other
lt-LT: ŠVOK valdymo tipas: Skaitmeninė; Rankinis; Programuojamas; Išmanusis; Kita
it: Tipo di controllo HVAC: Digital; Manuale; Programmabile; Smart; Altro
pl: Typ sterowania HVAC: Cyfrowe; Ręczny; Programowalny; Inteligentny; Inne
ja: 換気・空調制御の種類: デジタル; 手動; プログラム可能; スマート; その他
es: Tipo de control de HVAC: Digital; Manual; Programable; Inteligente; Otros
hu: HVAC-vezérlés típusa: Digitális; Manuális; Programozható; Intelligens; Egyéb
zh-CN: 暖通空调控制类型: 数字化; 手动; 可编程; 智能; 其他
cs: Typ ovládání topení, větrání a klimatizace: Digitální; Ruční; Programovatelné; Inteligentní; Jiné
nl: Bedieningstype HVAC: Digitaal; Handmatig; Programmeerbaar; Smart; Andere
zh-TW: HVAC 控制系類型: 數位; 手動; 程式輔助; 智慧; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta upravljanja HVAC: Digitalno; Ročno; Programabilno; Pametna; Drugo
th: ประเภทตัวควบคุม HVAC: ดิจิทัล; มือเข็น; ตั้งโปรแกรมได้; อัจฉริยะ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de controlo de HVAC: Digital; Manual; Programável; Inteligente; Outro
da: VVS-kontroltype: Digital; Manuel; Programmerbar; Smart; Andet
tr: HVAC kontrol türü: Dijital; Manuel; Programlanabilir; Akıllı; Diğer
el: Τύπος ελέγχου HVAC: Ψηφιακός; Μη αυτόματος; Προγραμματιζόμενος; Εξυπνος; Άλλο
ru: Тип управления системой ОВиК: Цифровой; Ручной; Программируемый; Умный; Другой
sv: Typ av kontroller för värme, ventilation och luftkonditionering: Digital; Manuell; Programmerbar; Smart; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip comandă HVAC: Digital; Manual; Programabil; Smart; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de controle HVAC: Digital; Manual; Programável; Inteligente; Outro